Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-520
Criminal trespass,
first degree; penalty.

(1) A person commits first
degree criminal trespass if:

(a) He or she enters or secretly
remains in any building or occupied structure, or any separately secured or
occupied portion thereof, knowing
that he or she is not licensed or privileged to do so; or

(b) He or she
enters or remains in or on a public power infrastructure facility knowing
that he or she does not have the consent of a person who has the right to
give consent to be in or on the facility.

(2)
First degree criminal trespass is a Class I misdemeanor.

(3) For purposes
of this section, public power infrastructure facility means a power plant,
an electrical station or substation, or any other facility which is used by
a public power supplier as defined in section 70-2103 to support the generation,
transmission, or distribution of electricity and which is surrounded by a
fence or is otherwise enclosed.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 119;

Laws 2009, LB238, § 1.

The plain language of "knowing" in subdivision (1)(a) of this section, in the context of entering any building or
occupied structure "knowing that he or she is not licensed or privileged to do so," imposes a subjective standard
focused on the accused's actual knowledge. State v. Stanko, 304 Neb. 675, 936 N.W.2d 353 (2019).

Criminal trespass in violation of subsection (1) of this section is not a lesser-included offense of burglary as defined in section 28-507(1). State v. Gonzales, 218 Neb. 43, 352 N.W.2d 571 (1984).

Criminal trespass is not a lesser-included offense of burglary. State v. Miller, 215 Neb. 145, 337 N.W.2d 424 (1983).